Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB734.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 322.330 is amended to read as follows:
The secretary-treasurer, or any other officer or designee properly authorized by the board,
shall:
(1) Receive and account for all money collected under this chapter and pay it into the
State Treasury; and
(2) Provide in an electronic format on the board's website[Web site] a roster showing
the names and addresses of all professional engineers, professional land surveyors,
and business entities holding permits to practice engineering or land surveying in
this state.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/25/2026 11:10 AM Jacketed